Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-82.5] Use of American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and other federal moneys. (a) The
director may provide financial assistance for publicly owned wastewater
treatment works for the construction of necessary wastewater infrastructure projects,
through the revolving fund, using moneys from the American Recovery and
Reinvestment Act of 2009 and other applicable federal acts.

(b) The director may establish a separate
account within the revolving fund and assign to that account federal moneys
appropriated under federal laws that authorize principal forgiveness, zero and
negative interest loans, and grants, including the American Recovery and
Reinvestment Act of 2009 and other applicable federal acts. The director may
use those moneys and in so doing may include additional requirements and
subsidization not applicable to the remainder of the revolving fund, including
forgiveness of principal, zero and negative interest loans, and grants to
publicly-owned wastewater treatment works that meet eligibility requirements
for the revolving fund.

(c) The director shall certify that a project
receiving financial assistance is entitled to priority over other eligible
projects on the basis of water pollution and financial needs, as well as a
preference to those projects that can be started and completed expeditiously as
stipulated under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and other
applicable federal acts.

(d) Among eligible projects, the director may
also give priority to projects that incorporate renewable energy, energy
efficiency, and conservation measures in wastewater infrastructure, to the
extent allowed by federal law.

(e) Each project receiving financial assistance shall
be in conformance with the conditions for water pollution control financing
under section 342D-87(a)(1), (2), (4), and (5), and (b). [L 2009, c 98, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next